Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-946.02
Noxious weed control; cities and villages; provide funds.

All cities and villages in this state shall provide for the control of noxious weeds within their jurisdiction and may appropriate money for and make the necessary expenditures for noxious weed control. The director shall advise cities and villages concerning noxious weed control.

Laws 1945, c. 2, § 23, p. 66;

Laws 1975, LB 14, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 138, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 49, § 3.